Maine, session 132, LD1159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
PAYMENT BY CASH
§1500-Y. Payment by cash
A municipality or other governmental entity offering goods or services for sale at retail
that charges a customer a fee on purchases made by credit card may not refuse payment in
the form of cash for the goods or services.
For purposes of this section, "sale at retail" means any retail transaction conducted in
person and does not include a transaction conducted remotely by telephone, mail or the
Internet.
Page 1 - 132LR1078(05)